Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Dream
Accounts Investment Program Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9011.1 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:

1. "Trump Account" means a federally authorized Trump Account
established pursuant to 26 U.S.C., Section 530A;
2. "Eligible child" means a person who:
a. is under eighteen (18) years of age at the time the
application for a Trump Account is submitted,
b. is a citizen of the United States and is assigned a
valid Social Security number,
c. has a primary residence within this state, and
d. has an established Trump Account; and
3. "Program" means the Oklahoma Dream Account Investment
Program.
B. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Dream Account
Investment Program, to be administered by the State Treasurer.
C. The program shall authorize a one-time contribution by this
state into a Trump Account established for an eligible child,
subject to the availability of funds.
D. The State Treasurer is authorized to contribute to Trump
Accounts upon verification that the Trump Account is established for
an eligible child and that the contribution does not cause the
balance of the fund to exceed any applicable federal contribution
limitations. Upon verification, the State Treasurer shall make a
one-time deposit of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), as funds
become available in the Oklahoma Trump Account Investment Fund,
created pursuant to Section 3 of this act. The State Treasurer
shall make contributions, in the order that verified applications
are submitted.
E. Applications for the contribution shall be made on a form
prescribed by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer may
promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this section.
F. Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize a
contribution that is prohibited by federal laws or regulations.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4071 Page 2

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9011.2 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Treasurer to be designated the "Oklahoma Trump Account
Investment Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the State Treasurer that are designated for deposit in the fund.
All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State Treasurer
for the purpose provided for in Section 2 of this act. Expenditures
from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4071 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4071 Page 4